Wyoming, session 2025, HB0112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-12-106(a) is amended to read:

35-12-106. Permit from council and county
commissioners required before commencing construction of
facility; electronic permitting; amendments; exceptions;
federal requirements.

HB0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0158
(a) No person shall commence to construct a facility,
as defined in this chapter, in this state without first
obtaining a permit for that facility from the council and,
if a separate permit from the applicable board of county
commissioners is not required under W.S. 18-5-501 through
18-5-513, without first obtaining permission to construct a
facility through a favorable vote of the applicable board
of county commissioners at a public meeting. Any facility,
for which a permit is required, shall be constructed,
operated and maintained in conformity with the permit and
any terms, conditions and modifications contained in the
permit. A permit permits. Permits may only be issued
pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to the provisions of
W.S. 18-5-501 through 18-5-513 for facilities referred to
the council.

Section 2. This act shall apply to industrial siting
projects initiated on or after the effective date of this
act.

Section 3. The industrial siting council shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0158
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0112